Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1412.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5338 of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5338. Modification of existing order.(a) Best interest of the child.--Upon petition, a court may modify a custody order to serve the best interest of the child[.] if the petitioner demonstrates a material change in circumstances, except as provided in subsection (d), in which case a showing of material change shall not be required.(b) Applicability.--(1) Except as provided in 51 Pa.C.S. § 4109 (relating to child custody proceedings during military deployment) and paragraph (2), this section shall apply to any custody order 1234567891011121314151617 entered by a court of this Commonwealth or any other state subject to the jurisdictional requirements set forth in Chapter 54 (relating to uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement).(2) A custody order entered prior to the effective date of this paragraph shall be modifiable without the necessity of demonstrating a material change in circumstances.(c) Dismissal.--Failure to demonstrate a material change of IN circumstances may result in the dismissal of the party's pleading or petition. For a case dismissed under this subsection, the court shall not be required to address the factors specified in section 5328 (relating to factors to consider when awarding custody).(d) Modification.--If a court determines that the best interests of the child requires modification of an existing order, the court may permit modification of the order without requiring the parties to demonstrate a material change in circumstances.(D) MODIFICATION.--(1) IF A COURT DETERMINES THAT THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD REQUIRES MODIFICATION OF AN EXISTING ORDER, THE COURT MAY PERMIT MODIFICATION OF THE ORDER WITHOUT REQUIRING THE PARTIES TO DEMONSTRATE A MATERIAL CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES.(2) IF A PARTY INCLUDES IN THE PETITION FOR MODIFICATION EVIDENCE OF RECENT ABUSE COMMITTED SUBSEQUENT TO THE ENTRY OF THE LAST CUSTODY ORDER, THE COURT MAY CONSIDER THE ABUSE A MATERIAL CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1412PN2068 - 2 - <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728